Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3682.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148E.065, subdivision 4a, is amended to read: Subd. 4a. City, county, and state social workers. new text begin (a)new text end Beginning July 1, 2016, the licensure of city, county, and state agency social workers is voluntary, except an individual who is newly employed by a city or state agency after July 1, 2016, must be licensed if the individual who provides social work services, as those services are defined in section 148E.010, subdivision 11, paragraph (b), is presented to the public by any title incorporating the words "social work" or "social worker." new text begin (b) Beginning July 1, 2026, a county agency social worker who does not hold a baccalaureate degree or graduate degree in social work or who is not licensed under this chapter must not be presented to the public by any title incorporating the words "social work" or "social worker," unless the individual was employed by the county agency prior to July 1, 2027. This paragraph is not grounds for the modification or removal of any right or benefit accrued under a collective bargaining agreement ratified before July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148E.195, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Representations. Effective July 1, 2016: (a) No applicant or other individual may be represented to the public by any title incorporating the words "social work" or "social worker" unless the individual is employed by a countynew text begin and meets the requirements under section 148E.065, subdivision 4a,new text end or holds a license according to this chapter. (b) In all professional use of a social worker's name, the social worker must use the license designation "LSW" or "licensed social worker" for a licensed social worker, "LGSW" or "licensed graduate social worker" for a licensed graduate social worker, "LISW" or "licensed independent social worker" for a licensed independent social worker, or "LICSW" or "licensed independent clinical social worker" for a licensed independent clinical social worker. (c) Public statements or advertisements must not be untruthful, misleading, false, fraudulent, deceptive, or potentially exploitative of clients, former clients, interns, students, supervisees, or the public. (d) A social worker must not: (1) use licensure status as a claim, promise, or guarantee of successful service; (2) obtain a license by cheating or employing fraud or deception; (3) make false statements or misrepresentations to the board or in materials submitted to the board; or (4) engage in conduct that has the potential to deceive or defraud a social work client, intern, student, supervisee, or the public. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148E.280, is amended to read: 148E.280 USE OF TITLES. No individual may be presented to the public by any title incorporating the words "social work" or "social worker" or in the titles in section 148E.195, unless that individual is employed by a countynew text begin and meets the requirements under section 148E.065, subdivision 4a,new text end or holds a license under this chapter.